Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6012 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. State-issued licenses shall automatically renew after ninety
(90) days of expiration under the following conditions:
1. Licensee submitted an application for renewal meeting all
necessary requirements for the relevant license before the
expiration date; and
2. Licensee remains in good standing with the relevant agency.
B. For purposes of this section, "in good standing" means:
1. The licensee had a valid license at the time of the
application; and

Req. No. 11614 Page 1

2. The licensee has no formal complaints or investigations at
the time of automatic renewal.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11614 TKR 01/15/25



















Req. No. 11614 Page 2